old/xu-hyphen/utf8-grahyph4.tex
ὑπερε2κ1τί ὑπερε2κ1τί ὑπερε2κ1τί   % <uperek-t'inw 
ὑπε3ρ2έπτ ὑπε3ρ2έπτ ὑπε3ρ2έπτ   % <upe-r'eptw, <upe-r'eyw 
ὑπε3ρ2επτ ὑπε3ρ2επτ 
ὑπε3ρ2έψ ὑπε3ρ2έψ ὑπε3ρ2έψ 
ὑπε3ρ2εψ ὑπε3ρ2εψ 
ὑπε3ρ2έω ὑπε3ρ2έω ὑπε3ρ2έω   % <upe-r'ew (-~w) <- <upe~ipon 
ὑπε3ρ2ῶ ὑπε3ρ2ῶ 
ὑπε3ρ2έε ὑπε3ρ2έε ὑπε3ρ2έε 
ὑπε3ρ2εῖς. ὑπε3ρ2εῖς. ὑπε3ρ2εῖϲ. ὑπε3ρ2εῖϲ. 
ὑπε3ρ2εῖσ. ὑπε3ρ2εῖσ. 
ὑπε3ρ2εῖ. ὑπε3ρ2εῖ. 
ὑπε3ρ2έο ὑπε3ρ2έο ὑπε3ρ2έο 
ὑπε3ρ2οῦ ὑπε3ρ2οῦ 
ὑπε3ρ2εῖτ ὑπε3ρ2εῖτ 
ὑπε3ρ2ώ ὑπε3ρ2ώ ὑπε3ρ2ώ   % <upe-r'w|a 
ὑπε3ρ2ω ὑπε3ρ2ω   % <upe-rw'ew 
ὕ2σ1τρ ὕ2σ1τρ ὕ2ϲ1τρ ὕ2ϲ1τρ   % <'us-trix 
ὑ2σ1τρ ὑ2σ1τρ ὑ2ϲ1τρ ὑ2ϲ1τρ   % <us-triq'ic 
.φαε2σ1φ .φαε2ϲ1φ   % faes-f'oroc 
.φω2σ1φ .φω2ϲ1φ   % fws-f'oroc 
.χαρι2σ1ανδρ .χαρι2ϲ1ανδρ   % qar'is-androc 
.χαρι2σ1άνδρ .χαρι2σ1άνδρ .χαρι2σ1άνδρ .χαρι2ϲ1άνδρ .χαρι2ϲ1άνδρ .χαρι2ϲ1άνδρ 
.χει2ρ1άγ .χει2ρ1άγ .χει2ρ1άγ   % qeir-'agra 
.χει2ρ1αγ   % qeir-agwg'oc 
.χει2ρ1απ   % qeir-apt'azw 
.χει2ρ1αψ   % qeir-ay'ia 
.χει2ρ1ου   % qeir-ourg'oc 
.χει2ρ1ῶν .χει2ρ1ῶν   % qeir-~wnax 
.χει2ρ1άν .χει2ρ1άν .χει2ρ1άν 
.χει2ρ1αν 
.χη2ν1ναλ   % qhn-al'wphx 
ὡ2σ1α2ν1εί. ὡ2σ1α2ν1εί. ὡ2σ1α2ν1εί. ὡ2ϲ1α2ν1εί. ὡ2ϲ1α2ν1εί. ὡ2ϲ1α2ν1εί.   % <ws-an-e'i 
ὡ2σ1α2ν1εὶ. ὡ2σ1α2ν1εὶ. ὡ2ϲ1α2ν1εὶ. ὡ2ϲ1α2ν1εὶ. 
ὡ2σ1αύτως. ὡ2σ1αύτως. ὡ2σ1αύτως. ὡ2ϲ1αύτωϲ. ὡ2ϲ1αύτωϲ. ὡ2ϲ1αύτωϲ.   % <ws-a'utwc 
ὡ2σ1αύτωσ. ὡ2σ1αύτωσ. ὡ2σ1αύτωσ. 
ὡ2σ1εί. ὡ2σ1εί. ὡ2σ1εί. ὡ2ϲ1εί. ὡ2ϲ1εί. ὡ2ϲ1εί.   % <ws-e'i 
ὡ2σ1εὶ. ὡ2σ1εὶ. ὡ2ϲ1εὶ. ὡ2ϲ1εὶ. 
ὥ2σ1περ. ὥ2σ1περ. ὥ2ϲ1περ. ὥ2ϲ1περ.   % <'ws-per 
ὡ2σ1πε2ρ1εί. ὡ2σ1πε2ρ1εί. ὡ2σ1πε2ρ1εί. ὡ2ϲ1πε2ρ1εί. ὡ2ϲ1πε2ρ1εί. ὡ2ϲ1πε2ρ1εί.   % <ws-per-e'i 
ὡ2σ1πε2ρ1εὶ. ὡ2σ1πε2ρ1εὶ. ὡ2ϲ1πε2ρ1εὶ. ὡ2ϲ1πε2ρ1εὶ. 
ὥ2σ1τε ὥ2σ1τε ὥ2ϲ1τε ὥ2ϲ1τε   % <'ws-te 
%%%%
%%%% 
ι2σ1χίλιοι. ι2σ1χίλιοι. ι2σ1χίλιοι. ι2ϲ1χίλιοι. ι2ϲ1χίλιοι. ι2ϲ1χίλιοι.   % dis-q'ilioi, k.>'a.<'o. 
ι2σ1χιλίων. ι2σ1χιλίων. ι2σ1χιλίων. ι2ϲ1χιλίων. ι2ϲ1χιλίων. ι2ϲ1χιλίων. 
ι2σ1χιλίοις. ι2σ1χιλίοις. ι2σ1χιλίοις. ι2ϲ1χιλίοιϲ. ι2ϲ1χιλίοιϲ. ι2ϲ1χιλίοιϲ. 
ι2σ1χιλίοισ. ι2σ1χιλίοισ. ι2σ1χιλίοισ. 
ι2σ1χιλίους. ι2σ1χιλίους. ι2σ1χιλίους. ι2ϲ1χιλίουϲ. ι2ϲ1χιλίουϲ. ι2ϲ1χιλίουϲ. 
ι2σ1χιλίουσ. ι2σ1χιλίουσ. ι2σ1χιλίουσ. 
ι2σ1χίλιαι. ι2σ1χίλιαι. ι2σ1χίλιαι. ι2ϲ1χίλιαι. ι2ϲ1χίλιαι. ι2ϲ1χίλιαι. 
ι2σ1χιλίαις. ι2σ1χιλίαις. ι2σ1χιλίαις. ι2ϲ1χιλίαιϲ. ι2ϲ1χιλίαιϲ. ι2ϲ1χιλίαιϲ. 
ι2σ1χιλίαισ. ι2σ1χιλίαισ. ι2σ1χιλίαισ. 
ι2σ1χιλίας. ι2σ1χιλίας. ι2σ1χιλίας. ι2ϲ1χιλίαϲ. ι2ϲ1χιλίαϲ. ι2ϲ1χιλίαϲ. 
ι2σ1χιλίασ. ι2σ1χιλίασ. ι2σ1χιλίασ. 
ι2σ1χίλια. ι2σ1χίλια. ι2σ1χίλια. ι2ϲ1χίλια. ι2ϲ1χίλια. ι2ϲ1χίλια. 
%
ι2σ1μύριοι. ι2σ1μύριοι. ι2σ1μύριοι. ι2ϲ1μύριοι. ι2ϲ1μύριοι. ι2ϲ1μύριοι.   % dis-m'urioi, k.>'a.<'o. 
ι2σ1μυρίων. ι2σ1μυρίων. ι2σ1μυρίων. ι2ϲ1μυρίων. ι2ϲ1μυρίων. ι2ϲ1μυρίων. 
ι2σ1μυρίοις. ι2σ1μυρίοις. ι2σ1μυρίοις. ι2ϲ1μυρίοιϲ. ι2ϲ1μυρίοιϲ. ι2ϲ1μυρίοιϲ. 
ι2σ1μυρίοισ. ι2σ1μυρίοισ. ι2σ1μυρίοισ. 
ι2σ1μυρίους. ι2σ1μυρίους. ι2σ1μυρίους. ι2ϲ1μυρίουϲ. ι2ϲ1μυρίουϲ. ι2ϲ1μυρίουϲ. 
ι2σ1μυρίουσ. ι2σ1μυρίουσ. ι2σ1μυρίουσ. 
ι2σ1μύριαι. ι2σ1μύριαι. ι2σ1μύριαι. ι2ϲ1μύριαι. ι2ϲ1μύριαι. ι2ϲ1μύριαι. 
ι2σ1μυρίαις. ι2σ1μυρίαις. ι2σ1μυρίαις. ι2ϲ1μυρίαιϲ. ι2ϲ1μυρίαιϲ. ι2ϲ1μυρίαιϲ. 
ι2σ1μυρίαισ. ι2σ1μυρίαισ. ι2σ1μυρίαισ. 
ι2σ1μυρίας. ι2σ1μυρίας. ι2σ1μυρίας. ι2ϲ1μυρίαϲ. ι2ϲ1μυρίαϲ. ι2ϲ1μυρίαϲ. 
ι2σ1μυρίασ. ι2σ1μυρίασ. ι2σ1μυρίασ. 
ι2σ1μύρια. ι2σ1μύρια. ι2σ1μύρια. ι2ϲ1μύρια. ι2ϲ1μύρια. ι2ϲ1μύρια. 
%
ι2σ1χιλιοστ ι2ϲ1χιλιοϲτ   % dis-qiliost'oc, k.>'a.<'o. 
%
ι2σ1μυριοστ ι2ϲ1μυριοϲτ   % dis-muriost'oc, k.>'a.<'o. 
%
ι2σ1χιλιάκις. ι2σ1χιλιάκις. ι2σ1χιλιάκις. ι2ϲ1χιλιάκιϲ. ι2ϲ1χιλιάκιϲ. ι2ϲ1χιλιάκιϲ.   % dis-qili'akic, k.>'a.<'o. 
ι2σ1χιλιάκισ. ι2σ1χιλιάκισ. ι2σ1χιλιάκισ. 
%
ι2σ1μυριάκις. ι2σ1μυριάκις. ι2σ1μυριάκις. ι2ϲ1μυριάκιϲ. ι2ϲ1μυριάκιϲ. ι2ϲ1μυριάκιϲ.   % dis-muri'akic, k.>'a.<'o. 
ι2σ1μυριάκισ. ι2σ1μυριάκισ. ι2σ1μυριάκισ. 
%-- Vowel patterns
α1 ε1 η1 ι1 ο1 υ1 ω1 ϊ1 ϋ1 ἀ1 ἁ1 ἂ1 ἃ1 ἄ1 ἅ1 ἆ1 ἇ1 ἐ1 ἑ1 ἒ1 ἓ1 ἔ1 ἕ1 ἠ1 ἡ1 ἢ1 ἣ1 ἤ1 ἥ1 ἦ1 ἧ1 ἰ1 ἱ1 ἲ1 ἳ1 ἴ1 ἵ1 ἶ1 ἷ1 ὀ1 ὁ1 ὂ1 ὃ1 ὄ1 ὅ1 ὐ1 ὑ1 ὒ1 ὓ1 ὔ1 ὕ1 ὖ1 ὗ1 ὠ1 ὡ1 ὢ1 ὣ1 ὤ1 ὥ1 ὦ1 ὧ1 ὰ1 ὲ1 ὴ1 ὶ1 ὸ1 ὺ1 ὼ1 ᾀ1 ᾁ1 ᾂ1 ᾃ1 ᾄ1 ᾅ1 ᾆ1 ᾇ1 ᾐ1 ᾑ1 ᾒ1 ᾓ1 ᾔ1 ᾕ1 ᾖ1 ᾗ1 ᾠ1 ᾡ1 ᾢ1 ᾣ1 ᾤ1 ᾥ1 ᾦ1 ᾧ1 ᾲ1 ᾳ1 ᾴ1 ᾶ1 ᾷ1 ῂ1 ῃ1 ῄ1 ῆ1 ῇ1 ῒ1 ῖ1 ῗ1 ῢ1 ῦ1 ῧ1 ῲ1 ῳ1 ῴ1 ῶ1 ῷ1 ά1 έ1 ή1 ί1 ό1 ύ1 ώ1 ΐ1 ΰ1 ά1 έ1 ή1 ί1 ό1 ύ1 ώ1 ΐ1 ΰ1 α2́1 α2̀1 α2͂1 α2̓1 α2̓́1 α2̓̀1 α2̓͂1 α2̔1 α2̔́1 α2̔̀1 α2̔͂1 α2ͅ1 α2́ͅ1 α2̀ͅ1 α2͂ͅ1 α2̓ͅ1 α2̓́ͅ1 α2̓̀ͅ1 α2̓͂ͅ1 α2̔ͅ1 α2̔́ͅ1 α2̔̀ͅ1 α2̔͂ͅ1 α2̈1 α2̈́1 α2̈̀1 α2̈͂1 ε2́1 ε2̀1 ε2͂1 ε2̓1 ε2̓́1 ε2̓̀1 ε2̓͂1 ε2̔1 ε2̔́1 ε2̔̀1 ε2̔͂1 ε2ͅ1 ε2́ͅ1 ε2̀ͅ1 ε2͂ͅ1 ε2̓ͅ1 ε2̓́ͅ1 ε2̓̀ͅ1 ε2̓͂ͅ1 ε2̔ͅ1 ε2̔́ͅ1 ε2̔̀ͅ1 ε2̔͂ͅ1 ε2̈1 ε2̈́1 ε2̈̀1 ε2̈͂1 η2́1 η2̀1 η2͂1 η2̓1 η2̓́1 η2̓̀1 η2̓͂1 η2̔1 η2̔́1 η2̔̀1 η2̔͂1 η2ͅ1 η2́ͅ1 η2̀ͅ1 η2͂ͅ1 η2̓ͅ1 η2̓́ͅ1 η2̓̀ͅ1 η2̓͂ͅ1 η2̔ͅ1 η2̔́ͅ1 η2̔̀ͅ1 η2̔͂ͅ1 η2̈1 η2̈́1 η2̈̀1 η2̈͂1 ι2́1 ι2̀1 ι2͂1 ι2̓1 ι2̓́1 ι2̓̀1 ι2̓͂1 ι2̔1 ι2̔́1 ι2̔̀1 ι2̔͂1 ι2ͅ1 ι2́ͅ1 ι2̀ͅ1 ι2͂ͅ1 ι2̓ͅ1 ι2̓́ͅ1 ι2̓̀ͅ1 ι2̓͂ͅ1 ι2̔ͅ1 ι2̔́ͅ1 ι2̔̀ͅ1 ι2̔͂ͅ1 ι2̈1 ι2̈́1 ι2̈̀1 ι2̈͂1 ο2́1 ο2̀1 ο2͂1 ο2̓1 ο2̓́1 ο2̓̀1 ο2̓͂1 ο2̔1 ο2̔́1 ο2̔̀1 ο2̔͂1 ο2ͅ1 ο2́ͅ1 ο2̀ͅ1 ο2͂ͅ1 ο2̓ͅ1 ο2̓́ͅ1 ο2̓̀ͅ1 ο2̓͂ͅ1 ο2̔ͅ1 ο2̔́ͅ1 ο2̔̀ͅ1 ο2̔͂ͅ1 ο2̈1 ο2̈́1 ο2̈̀1 ο2̈͂1 υ2́1 υ2̀1 υ2͂1 υ2̓1 υ2̓́1 υ2̓̀1 υ2̓͂1 υ2̔1 υ2̔́1 υ2̔̀1 υ2̔͂1 υ2ͅ1 υ2́ͅ1 υ2̀ͅ1 υ2͂ͅ1 υ2̓ͅ1 υ2̓́ͅ1 υ2̓̀ͅ1 υ2̓͂ͅ1 υ2̔ͅ1 υ2̔́ͅ1 υ2̔̀ͅ1 υ2̔͂ͅ1 υ2̈1 υ2̈́1 υ2̈̀1 υ2̈͂1 ω2́1 ω2̀1 ω2͂1 ω2̓1 ω2̓́1 ω2̓̀1 ω2̓͂1 ω2̔1 ω2̔́1 ω2̔̀1 ω2̔͂1 ω2ͅ1 ω2́ͅ1 ω2̀ͅ1 ω2͂ͅ1 ω2̓ͅ1 ω2̓́ͅ1 ω2̓̀ͅ1 ω2̓͂ͅ1 ω2̔ͅ1 ω2̔́ͅ1 ω2̔̀ͅ1 ω2̔͂ͅ1 ω2̈1 ω2̈́1 ω2̈̀1 ω2̈͂1 
}
\endgroup
\endinput
